Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Chapter 4 Child Care Facilities

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort liability of private nursery school or day-care center, or employee thereof, for injury to child while attending facility, 58 ALR4th 240.

Governmental liability for negligence in licensing, regulating or supervising private day-care home in which child is injured, 68 ALR4th 266.